Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-20,145
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Dissenters' rights; payment.

(1) Except as provided in section 21-20,147, as soon as the proposed corporate action is taken, or upon receipt of a payment demand, the corporation shall pay each dissenter who complied with section 21-20,143 the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of his or her shares, plus accrued interest.

(2) The payment shall be accompanied by:

(a) The corporation's balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than sixteen months before the date of payment, an income statement for that year, a statement of changes in shareholders' equity for that year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any;

(b) A statement of the corporation's estimate of the fair value of the shares;

(c) An explanation of how the interest was calculated;

(d) A statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under section 21-20,148; and

(e) A copy of sections 21-20,137 to 21-20,150.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 145.